Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-602
Revenue sharing; interpretation.

It is the intent of the Legislature that in construing section 13-601 the courts will be guided by the interpretations given by the Office of Revenue Sharing, U.S. Department of Treasury and by the federal courts to section 103 of the State and Local Fiscal Assistance Act of 1972, 31 U.S.C. 1222, as from time to time amended.

Laws 1974, LB 824, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-2702.